Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-181
Initial credential to operate business; renewal of credential; denial by department; powers of department.

If an applicant for an initial credential to operate a business does not meet all of the requirements for the credential, the department shall deny issuance of the credential. If an applicant for an initial credential to operate a business or a credential holder applying for renewal of the credential to operate a business has committed any of the acts set out in section 38-182, the department may deny issuance or refuse renewal of the credential or may issue or renew the credential subject to any of the terms imposed under section 38-196 in order to protect the public.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 81.